Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-627
Adoptive birth certificates; filing; copies; issuance.

(1) The certificate of birth of adopted children shall be filed as other certificates of birth. The department shall charge and collect the same fee as prescribed in subsection (1) of section 71-612 for each certificate filed. All such fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund. The department shall charge and collect an additional fee of one dollar for each certificate issued. All amounts collected from such additional fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Child Abuse Prevention Fund.

(2) Upon request and payment of the fees required by section 71-612, a certified copy of an adoptive birth certificate shall be furnished by the department. All fees for a certified copy shall be handled as provided in section 71-612.

Laws 1941, c. 143, § 2, p. 572;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-114;

R.S.1943, § 71-627;

Laws 1953, c. 243, § 1, p. 833;

Laws 1959, c. 323, § 6, p. 1183;

Laws 1961, c. 342, § 2, p. 1094;

Laws 1965, c. 418, § 10, p. 1340;

Laws 1965, c. 419, § 4, p. 1343;

Laws 1971, LB 246, § 3;

Laws 1973, LB 583, § 10;

Laws 1983, LB 617, § 16;

Laws 1986, LB 333, § 11;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 32;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 55;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 34;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 538;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 157;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 48, § 5;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 59;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 88;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 431.